District of Columbia statutes.
47-4703

Chief Financial Officer guidance.

For the preparation of the financial analysis required by § 47-4701(b)(1)(F) and the annual certification required by § 47-4702, the Chief Financial Officer shall set forth guidance regarding the collection of information necessary to implement these sections.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7142(b), 58 DCR 6226
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7162(b), 60 DCR 12472
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “§ 47-4701(b)(1)(F)” for “§ 47-4701(b)(4).”
Section 13(c) of D.C. Law 19-53 added a section to read as follows: “§ 47-4704. Applicability. ”This chapter shall apply as of October 1, 2011.“.
Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 19-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 108(c) of D.C. Law 19-226 added section 47-4704 to read as follows:
“§ 47-4704. Applicability.
“This chapter shall apply as of October 1, 2011.”
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-235 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition of sections, see §§ 13(c), 14 of Revised Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-157, October 4, 2011, 58 DCR 8688).
For temporary addition of § 47-4704, concerning the applicability of this chapter, see § 108(a) and (c) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478).
For temporary addition of § 47-4704, concerning the applicability of the chapter, see § 108(c) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7162(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7162(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7161 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle P of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Tax Abatement Financial Analysis Requirements Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.